incubator/apertium-pl-sk/apertium-pl-sk.pl.dix
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gi</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gi</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gie</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzy</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gie</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gie</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gie</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gie</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>gie</l>
          <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dru/gi__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>gi<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__drugi"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dro/gi__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>gi<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__drugi"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gio</l>
          <r>gi<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="drugi"><i>dru</i><par n="dru/gi__det"/></e>
    <e><re>[0-9]+</re><par n="dru/gi__det"/></e>
    <e><re>[0-9]+</re><i>-</i><par n="dru/gi__det"/></e>
    <e lm="drogi"><i>dro</i><par n="dro/gi__adj"/></e>
